mzt.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Nombre

LEXICON Root

chito%<n%>:chito N ; ! "mosco"
tsa̠%<n%>:tsa̠ N ; ! "rápido"
tsi̠u̠n%<n%>:tsi̠u̠n N ; ! "cigarro"
tsju%<n%>:tsju N ; ! "tostado"
tsjá%<n%>:tsjá N ; ! "tejón"
tsjaukun%<n%>:tsjaukun N ; ! "bonito"
tsje̠e%<n%>:tsje̠e N ; ! "limpio"
tsjíán%<n%>:tsjíán N ; ! "musgo"
tsiniín%<n%>:tsiniín N ; ! "tío"
tsiñán%<n%>:tsiñán N ; ! "camarón"
tsi'i%<n%>:tsi N ; ! "nauseas"
niyana%<n%>:niyana N ; ! "nuestra casa"
maestrori%<n%>:maestrori N ; ! "tu maestro"
maestrona%<n%>:maestrona N ; ! "mi maestro"
naxtiná%<n%>:naxtiná N ; ! "mis ropas"
niñuna%<n%>:niñuna N ; ! "mi tortilla"
ápana%<n%>:ápana N ; ! "mi papá"
tareari%<n%>:tareari N ; ! "tu tarea"
yaniñuba%<n%>:yaniñuba N ; ! "la tortillera"
niyajiejan%<n%>:niyajiejan N ; ! "casa grande"
tsinira%<n%>:tsinira N ; ! "mi tío"
tsinira%<n%>:tsini N ; ! "su tío"
ndetjuúan%<n%>:ndetjúan N ; ! "mi naríz"
ndetjún%<n%>:ndetjún N ; ! "tú nariz"
niyaba%<n%>:niyaba N ; ! "la casa"
tjiéba%<n%>:tjiéba N ; ! "el zapato"
niñuba%<n%>:niñuba N ; ! "la tortilla"
natsiee%<n%>:natsiee N ; ! "conejo"
natsieéba%<n%>:natsieéba N ; ! "los conejos"
naxkie%<n%>:naxkie N ; ! "sapo"
naxkié%<n%>:naxkié N ; ! "sapos"
naña%<n%>:naña N ; ! "perro"
nañá%<n%>:nañá N ; ! "perros"
kutu%<n%>:kutu N ; ! "camisa"
kutuna%<n%>:kutuna N ; ! "mi camisa"
kuturi%<n%>:kuturi N ; ! "tu camisa"
kutura%<n%>:kutura N ; ! "su camisa"
nanguiná%<n%>:nanguiná N ; ! "mi tierra"

LEXICON POSS
%<px1sg%>:%>ná # ; ! 
%<px2sg%>:%>ri # ; !
%<px3sg%>:%>rá # ; !

LEXICON N
#;
POSS;
